Massachusetts, session 194th, H2888.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 32b of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is
hereby amended by striking out lines 30-34 and inserting in place there of the following: -
“committee shall consist of a representative of each collective bargaining unit with which
the political subdivision negotiates under chapter 150E and a retiree representative designated by
the Retired State, County and Municipal Employee Association.”
of 1